District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.111

Repealed

Appropriation of funds.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 306, Pub. L. 87-569, § 111
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1099l.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.13.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.111.